Hawaii, session 2026, HB1124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 334, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding to part IV a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§334-     Psychiatric facility; procurement of and payment of expenses for medical care and long-term care.  (a)  Rates of payments for medical care for patients of the Hawaii state hospital and for patients under the custody of the director at a psychiatric facility other than the Hawaii state hospital shall be limited to the Hawaii medicaid fee schedule or the provider's billed amount, whichever is less. (b)  The department may establish rates of payment for long-term care services provided for patients who are discharged to a long-term care facility from the Hawaii state hospital or from a psychiatric facility other than the Hawaii state hospital where they were under the custody of the director. (c)  The department shall be exempt from chapter 103F for the procurement of medical care for patients of the Hawaii state hospital and for patients of a psychiatric facility other than the Hawaii state hospital who are under the custody of the director, and for the procurement of long-term care for patients discharged to a long-term care facility from the Hawaii state hospital or from a psychiatric facility other than the Hawaii state hospital where they were under the custody of the director. (d)  For the purposes of this section: "Long-term care" means care provided by a long-term care facility. "Long-term care facility" shall have the same meaning as in section 349-21. "Medical care" means examination, diagnosis, or treatment for medical and dental conditions to include outpatient and hospital-based services as well as appliances and supplies deemed clinically necessary by the department, and does not include long-term care." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST